Illinois, session 104th, HB2854.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-178 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/5-178)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 5-178)7    Sec. 5-178. Board created. A board of 8 members shall 8constitute a board of trustees authorized to administer the 9provisions of this Article. The board shall be known as the 10Retirement Board of the Policemen's Annuity and Benefit Fund 11of the city.12    The board shall consist of 4 persons appointed by the 13mayor of the city; 4 3 policemen employed by the city, at least 14one of whom shall be a lieutenant or of a rank superior to 15lieutenant, one of whom shall be of the rank of sergeant, and 2 16one of whom shall be of the rank of investigator or a rank 17inferior to that rank; and one annuitant of the fund, or a 18pensioner of any prior police pension fund in operation, by 19authority of law, in the city. Children less than age 18 shall 20not be eligible for board membership. The term of office for 21all members shall be 3 years. For the election to be held in 222008 only, the terms for the member who is a lieutenant or of a 23rank superior to lieutenant and the member who is a sergeant   HB2854- 2 -LRB104 11141 RPS 21223 b1shall be 3 years and the terms for the member who is an 2investigator or a rank inferior to that rank and the annuitant 3member shall be 4 years. After the terms of the 2008 election 4are completed, the terms revert to 3-year terms for each 5elected trustee. Upon his election, the member holding the 6rank of investigator or a rank inferior to that rank shall be 7detailed by the Police Superintendent to the office of the 8board for the duration of his or her term as trustee.9    Any newly created elected position on the board shall be 10filled in the same manner as provided for vacant positions 11under Section 5-180. 12    The members of a retirement board holding office in a city 13at the time this Article becomes effective, including elected, 14appointed and ex officio ex-officio members, shall continue in 15office until the expiration of their respective terms or 16appointment and until their respective successors are elected 17or appointed, and qualified.18    At least 30 days prior to the expiration of the term of 19office of each appointive member the mayor shall appoint a 20successor for a term of 3 years. 21    The board shall conduct a regular election at least 30 22days prior to the expiration of the terms of the active 23policemen members and annuitant or beneficiary members for 24election of a successor of each such member for a term of 3 25years.26    Any member of the board so appointed or elected shall   HB2854- 3 -LRB104 11141 RPS 21223 b1continue in office until his successor is selected and has 2qualified.3    Any person so appointed or elected shall qualify by taking 4an oath of office. A copy thereof shall be kept in the office 5of the city clerk of the city.6(Source: P.A. 95-1036, eff. 2-17-09.)